Arkansas, session 2025, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-4-405(a)(21), concerning Class C permit
violations, is amended to read as follows:
(21) Unauthorized purchasing by a private club from other than a
retailer or small brewery permit holder as provided in § 3-9-221;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-9-221(a) and (b), concerning the private
club exception from alcoholic beverage laws, are amended to read as follows:
(a) The General Assembly recognizes that:
(1) Many individuals in this state serve mixed drinks containing
alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests in the privacy of their homes
and, in addition, that many individuals associated together in private
nonprofit corporations established for fraternal, patriotic, recreational,
political, social, or other mutual purposes as authorized by law, established
not for pecuniary gain, have provided for their mutual convenience and for
*CRH114*
03-19-2025 15:27:38 CRH114

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/12/25 H3/19/25 HB1455
the preparation and serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks
prepared from alcoholic beverages owned by the members individually or in
common under a so-called “locker”, “pool”, or “revolving fund” system
lawfully purchased;
(2) Many individuals travel to this state to assemble at
regional meetings and conventions to associate with other individuals who are
members of professional and social organizations and that:
(A) Many of the restaurants and entertainment facilities
used for the meetings and conventions promote the hospitality of the host
communities where the restaurants, convention, and entertainment facilities
are located;
(B) Many of the host organizations plan to serve mixed
drinks containing alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests at these
meetings and while entertaining and dining during these conventions; and
(C) Many of the host communities have individuals who have
associated together in private nonprofit corporations established for
recreational, social, community hospitality, professional association,
entertainment, or other mutual purposes established, not for pecuniary gain,
but for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and
serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks prepared from alcoholic
beverages owned by the members individually or in common under a so-called
locker, pool, or revolving fund system lawfully purchased; and
(3)(A)(i) That there are a number of counties or parts of
counties where the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors has not been
approved by the voters.
(ii) However, within those counties or parts of
counties there are significant developments of tourism facilities and large-
event facilities that promote the economic development of the state.
(B) To ensure that tourism and large-event facilities as
well as other associated activities are allowed to exist to promote the
economic development in the state, a new hotel or large-event facility
private club permit, for use in those places where the public retail sale of
intoxicating liquors is not authorized, should be created.
(C) These permits are necessary so that persons visiting
hotels or large-event facilities in these areas will be able to enjoy the
amenities that a person might find in other states.
03-19-2025 15:27:38 CRH114

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/12/25 H3/19/25 HB1455
(D) This additional permit will enhance the experience of
going to hotels or large-event facilities that may display items of historic
interest, contain extensive art collections, or host musical or dramatic
presentations.
(E)(i) Further, since the counties or parts of counties in
which these hotels or large-event facilities will be located do not allow the
open public retail sale of intoxicating liquors, the nonprofit corporations
that have been established to have the hotel facilities or the large-event
facilities should be allowed to offer alcoholic beverages to members of the
nonprofit corporations and their guests.
(ii) These nonprofit corporations have been
established for the purpose of operating a qualifying hotel or large-event
facility private club or other mutual purposes, not for pecuniary gain, but
for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and serving
to the members and their guests alcoholic beverages owned by the members
individually or in common under a locker, pool, or revolving fund system
lawfully purchased.
(b)(1) In order to clarify the alcoholic beverage control laws of this
state and to regulate and prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages in
violation of the provisions of this subchapter and other applicable alcoholic
beverage control laws of this state, the General Assembly determines that the
preparation, mixing, and serving of mixed drinks, beer, and wine for
consumption only on the premises of a private club as defined in § 3-9-
202(14) by the members thereof and their guests and the making of a charge
for such services shall not be deemed to be a sale or be in violation of any
law of this state prohibiting the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving
away of intoxicating liquor whenever:
(A) The alcoholic beverages, beer, and wine so consumed
have been furnished or drawn from private stocks thereof belonging to such
members, individually or in common under a so-called locker, pool, or
revolving fund system and are replenished only at the expense of such
members; and
(B) The the private club has acquired a permit from the
Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, in such form as the board may appropriately
determine.

03-19-2025 15:27:38 CRH114

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/12/25 H3/19/25 HB1455
(2)(A) A private club may serve any alcoholic beverage furnished
or drawn under the provisions of subdivision (b)(1) of this section on the
golf course on which the private club is located when the private club is
hosting a professional golf tournament or other charitable golf tournament
sponsored by a charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and
the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division has been notified by
the private club at least sixty (60) calendar days prior to the beginning of
the event.
(B) Persons attending the event shall be deemed guests of
the private club, and the club may serve the alcoholic beverages to the
guests for cash.
(C) The director may promulgate rules he or she deems
necessary to implement this subdivision (b)(2).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-9-221, concerning private club exception
from alcoholic beverage laws, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(d)(1) A private club located in an entertainment district may
purchase from a holder of a small brewery permit the alcoholic beverages
brewed by the small brewery permit holder if the private club located in the
entertainment district and the small brewery permit holder are parties to an
exclusive agreement.
(2) The private club located in an entertainment district and the small
brewery permit holder that enter into an exclusive agreement under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be located in adjacent counties.
(3) A small brewery permit holder may enter into an exclusive
agreement under this section with only one (1) private club at a time.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-9-223(b), concerning the supplemental tax
on gross proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private clubs, is amended
to read as follows:
(b)(1) In addition, there is levied a supplemental tax of ten percent
(10%) upon the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club
from the charges to members for the preparation and serving of mixed drinks
or for the cooling and serving of beer and wine, drawn from the private
stocks of the members as provided in § 3-9-221, for consumption only on the
03-19-2025 15:27:38 CRH114

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/12/25 H3/19/25 HB1455
premises where served.
(2) In addition to the tax levied under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, a supplemental tax of four percent (4%) is levied on the gross
proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club from the charges to
members for the preparation and serving of mixed drinks drawn from the
private stocks of the members as provided in § 3-9-221 for consumption only
on the premises where served.

/s/Pilkington



























03-19-2025 15:27:38 CRH114